src-fst-morphology-affixes-pronouns.lexc.md
# Pronoun inflection
Nenets pronouns inflection

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ for the unclassified ones

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ etc.

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ etc. 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@  etc.

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 
+Interr+Sem/Hum:  POSSESSA-PLURAL ;  +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

**LEXICON æLEXNAME@ 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
